Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-503
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 20-501 to 20-506:

(1) Disparate treatment means differential treatment of persons on the basis of race, color, or national origin;

(2) Motor vehicle stop means any stop of a motor vehicle, except for a stop of a motor truck, truck-tractor, semitrailer, trailer, or towed vehicle at a state weighing station; and

(3) Racial profiling means detaining an individual or conducting a motor vehicle stop based upon disparate treatment of an individual.

Laws 2001, LB 593, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1162, § 1.